Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE E. SERVICES FOR FAMILIES

CHAPTER 51. FAMILY VIOLENCE CENTERS

Sec. 51.001. PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to promote development of and access to locally based and supported nonprofit services for victims of family violence throughout the state.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

Text of subdivision effective until September 01, 2024

(1) "Family" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.003, Family Code.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(1) "Dating relationship" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.0021(b), Family Code.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(1-a) "Dating violence" means an act, other than a defensive measure to protect oneself, by an individual against another individual with whom the actor has or has had a dating relationship and that is:

(A) intended to result in physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or sexual assault;

(B) a threat that reasonably places an individual in fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or sexual assault; or

(C) intended to inflict emotional harm, including an act of emotional abuse.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(1-b) "Family" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.003, Family Code.

Text of subdivision effective until September 01, 2024

(2) "Family violence" means an act by a member of a family or household against another member of the family or household that:

(A) is intended to result in physical harm, bodily injury, or assault or that is a threat that reasonably places the member in fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault, but does not include defensive measures to protect oneself; or

(B) is intended to inflict emotional harm, including an act of emotional abuse.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(2) "Family violence" means:

(A) an act by a member of a family or household against another member of the family or household that:

(i) is intended to result in physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or sexual assault or that is a threat that reasonably places the member in fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or sexual assault, but does not include defensive measures to protect oneself; or

(ii) is intended to inflict emotional harm, including an act of emotional abuse; or

(B) dating violence.

(3) "Family violence center" includes a family violence shelter center and a family violence nonresidential center.

(4) "Family violence nonresidential center" means a program that:

(A) is operated by a public or private nonprofit organization; and

(B) provides comprehensive nonresidential services to victims of family violence.

(5) "Family violence shelter center" means a program that:

(A) is operated by a public or private nonprofit organization; and

(B) provides comprehensive residential and nonresidential services to victims of family violence.

(6) "Family violence special project" means a project that:

(A) is operated by a public or private nonprofit organization; and

(B) provides at least one specialized family violence service.

(7) "Household" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.005, Family Code.

(8) "Member of a household" has the meaning assigned by Section 71.006, Family Code.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(8-a) "Trauma-informed" in regard to a service or service model means that the service or service model is provided in a manner that recognizes and responds to the signs and symptoms of trauma in, and the risks of trauma to, a victim of family violence to better support the victim and promote the victim's choice, trust, dignity, connection, and healing.

Text of subdivision effective until September 01, 2024

(9) "Victim of family violence" means:

(A) an adult member of a family or household who is subjected to an act of family violence; or

(B) a member of the household of the adult described by Paragraph (A), other than the member of the household who commits the act of family violence, including an act of emotional abuse.

Text of subdivision effective on September 01, 2024

(9) "Victim of family violence" means:

(A) an adult member of a family or household who is subjected to an act of family violence;

(B) a member of the household of the adult described by Paragraph (A), other than the member of the household who commits the act of family violence, including an act of emotional abuse; or

(C) an individual who is subjected to an act of dating violence.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 36, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(27), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 164 (S.B. 1841), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2024.

Sec. 51.0021. FAMILY VIOLENCE SERVICES PLAN. (a) The commission shall develop and maintain a plan for delivering family violence services in this state.

(b) In developing the plan under this section, the commission shall consider the geographic distribution of services and the need for services, including the need for increasing services for underserved populations.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.290, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.003. CONTRACTS. (a) The commission shall contract for services with family violence centers with consideration given to the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021. These contracts are to expand existing family violence center services and may not result in reducing financial support a family violence center receives from another source. The contracts shall not provide for more than 75 percent of the cost of the family violence center program. The commission shall develop a declining scale of state financial support for family violence centers, declining over a six-year period from the initiation of each individual contract, with no more than 50 percent of a family violence center program's funding to be provided by the state after the sixth year. The balance each year shall be provided from other sources. The executive commissioner may adopt rules which will allow exceptions to the above scale in individual instances when a family violence center shall demonstrate that exigent circumstances require such a waiver.

(b) The commission may contract with family violence special projects for services. The commission shall consider the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021 in contracting with family violence special projects.

(c) The commission shall contract statewide for activities that support and advance the work of family violence centers. Activities contracted for under this subsection must include the provision of technical assistance and training for family violence centers. The commission may contract for the provision of public education, consultation to the commission, research, evaluation, and liaison and training for other professionals who work with victims of family violence, including professionals in the criminal justice, medical, and social services fields, and for community or civic groups.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 , Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2015.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 19, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.291, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (S.B. 59), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 51.004. CONTRACT ELIGIBILITY; PROCUREMENT; APPLICATION PROCESS.

Text of subsection effective until September 01, 2024

(a) To be eligible for a contract under Section 51.003(a), a family violence shelter center must:

(1) provide temporary lodging and direct delivery of services for adults and their dependents;

(2) have been in actual operation offering shelter services 24 hours a day with a capacity for not less than five persons for at least one year before the date on which the contract is awarded;

(3) demonstrate that the center, through the services it provides, is addressing a need in the community consistent with the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021; and

(4) submit a contract application on forms prescribed by the commission.

Text of subsection effective on September 01, 2024

(a) To be eligible for a contract under Section 51.003(a), a family violence shelter center must:

(1) provide temporary lodging and direct delivery of services for adults and their dependents;

(2) have been in actual operation offering shelter services 24 hours a day with a capacity for not less than five persons for at least one year before the date on which the contract is awarded;

(3) demonstrate that the center, through the services it provides, is addressing a need in the community consistent with the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021;

(4) demonstrate that the center is using a voluntary and trauma-informed advocacy service model that respects an individual's needs; and

(5) submit a contract application on forms prescribed by the commission.

Text of subsection effective until September 01, 2024

(b) To be eligible for a contract under Section 51.003(a), a family violence nonresidential center must:

(1) provide, as its primary purpose, direct delivery of services to adult victims of family violence;

(2) demonstrate a system of referring victims of family violence to at least one family violence shelter center or other safe temporary lodging;

(3) have been operating and providing comprehensive services, including the services described by Section 51.005(b)(3), to victims of family violence for at least one year before the date on which the contract is awarded;

(4) demonstrate that the center, through the services it provides, is addressing a need in the community consistent with the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021; and

(5) submit a contract application on forms prescribed by the commission.

Text of subsection effective on September 01, 2024

(b) To be eligible for a contract under Section 51.003(a), a family violence nonresidential center must:

(1) provide, as its primary purpose, direct delivery of services to adult victims of family violence;

(2) demonstrate a system of referring victims of family violence to at least one family violence shelter center or other safe temporary lodging;

(3) have been operating and providing comprehensive services, including the services described by Section 51.005(b)(3), to victims of family violence for at least one year before the date on which the contract is awarded;

(4) demonstrate that the center, through the services it provides, is addressing a need in the community consistent with the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021;

(5) demonstrate that the center is using a voluntary and trauma-informed advocacy service model that respects an individual's needs; and

(6) submit a contract application on forms prescribed by the commission.

(c) The commission shall consider the following factors in awarding contracts under Section 51.003(a):

(1) the family violence center's eligibility for and use of funds from the federal government, philanthropic organizations, and voluntary sources;

(2) community support for the family violence center, as evidenced by financial contributions from civic organizations, local governments, and individuals;

(3) evidence that the family violence center provides services that encourage self-sufficiency and effectively uses community resources;

(4) evidence of involvement with local law enforcement officials; and

(5) support for the family violence center through volunteer work, especially volunteer effort by persons who have been victims of family violence.

(d) To be eligible for a contract under Section 51.003(b), a family violence special project must:

(1) provide:

(A) community education relating to family violence; or

(B) direct delivery of services for adult victims of family violence or their children;

(2) demonstrate a system of referring victims of family violence to at least one family violence shelter center or other safe temporary lodging;

(3) demonstrate that the project, through the services it provides, is addressing a need in the community consistent with the plan for family violence services under Section 51.0021;

(4) demonstrate that the underserved or special population to be served by the project is involved in the project's design and implementation, if applicable; and

(5) submit a contract application on forms prescribed by the commission.

(e) The commission shall use a noncompetitive procurement procedure to award a contract under Section 51.003(a) or (b) if the commission determines that there is no competition between eligible family violence centers for services or a service area. If the commission determines that there is competition between eligible family violence centers for services or a service area, the commission shall award a contract under Section 51.003(a) or (b) through an application process that considers the eligibility requirements and other factors provided in this section and allocates the money in accordance with this chapter and with consideration of the family violence services plan under Section 51.0021.

(f) The commission shall consult with a statewide family violence organization to develop the application process described in Subsection (e) but may not involve the organization in the contract selection or award process.

(g) To the extent of any conflict between this section and any other law, including Chapter 2155, Government Code, this section controls.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.292, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (S.B. 59), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (S.B. 59), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 164 (S.B. 1841), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2024.

Sec. 51.005. CONTRACT SPECIFICATIONS. (a) The commission shall contract only with public or private nonprofit organizations that fulfill the requirements of this chapter.

Text of subsection effective until September 01, 2024

(b) The contracts shall require the persons operating a family violence center to:

(1) make a quarterly and an annual financial report on a form prescribed by the commission;

(2) cooperate with inspections the commission makes to ensure services standards and fiscal responsibility; and

(3) provide, as its primary purpose, services to victims of family violence that include:

(A) 24-hour-a-day shelter, except that a family violence nonresidential center may provide access to a 24-hour-a-day shelter;

(B) a 24-hour-a-day crisis hotline, except that a family violence nonresidential center may provide access to a 24-hour-a-day crisis hotline operated by another organization located in the nonresidential center's service area;

(C) access to emergency medical care;

(D) intervention services, including safety planning, understanding and support, information, education, referrals, and other resource assistance;

(E) access to emergency transportation;

(F) legal assistance in the civil and criminal justice systems, including:

(i) identifying individual needs, legal rights, and legal options; and

(ii) providing support and accompaniment in pursuing those options;

(G) information about educational arrangements for children;

(H) information about training for and seeking employment;

(I) cooperation with criminal justice officials;

(J) community education;

(K) a referral system to existing community services; and

(L) a volunteer recruitment and training program.

Text of subsection effective on September 01, 2024

(b) The contracts shall require the persons operating a family violence center to:

(1) make a quarterly and an annual financial report on a form prescribed by the commission;

(2) cooperate with inspections the commission makes to ensure services standards and fiscal responsibility; and

(3) provide, as its primary purpose, voluntary and trauma-informed services to victims of family violence that include:

(A) 24-hour-a-day shelter, except that a family violence nonresidential center may provide access to a 24-hour-a-day shelter;

(B) a 24-hour-a-day crisis hotline, except that a family violence nonresidential center may provide access to a 24-hour-a-day crisis hotline operated by another organization located in the nonresidential center's service area;

(C) access to emergency medical care;

(D) crisis and intervention services, including understanding and support, information, education, referrals, and other resource assistance;

(E) access to emergency transportation;

(F) advocacy focused on:

(i) economic and housing stability;

(ii) physical, behavioral, and mental health;

(iii) the needs of children who are victims and the children of victims; and

(iv) the civil and criminal legal systems, including:

(a) identifying individual needs, legal rights, and legal options; and

(b) providing support and accompaniment in pursuing those options;

(G) ongoing safety planning services in collaboration with the self-stated priorities and needs of the victim of family violence;

(H) community education regarding family violence and family violence prevention efforts;

(I) counseling services; and

(J) peer support services led by victims of family violence, including activities and other efforts that facilitate connections and the creation of community among victims of family violence.

Text of subsection effective on September 01, 2024

(b-1) The contracts shall:

(1) specify that participation in services by a victim of family violence is voluntary; and

(2) prohibit the persons operating a family violence center from requiring a victim of family violence to participate in other services as a condition of receiving shelter.

(c) The contracts may require the persons operating a family violence center to use intake and case study forms. Forms required shall be developed by the commission with consultation as outlined in Section 51.008.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.293, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 164 (S.B. 1841), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2024.

Sec. 51.0051. MAXIMIZING FEDERAL FUNDING FOR PROGRAMS TO BENEFIT VICTIMS OF FAMILY VIOLENCE. To maximize the state's receipt of federal matching funds for emergency assistance under Part A, Title IV, Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 601 et seq.):

(1) the commission shall:

(A) ensure that a contract made under Section 51.003 includes provisions necessary to maximize federal funding for services for victims of family violence; and

(B) file amendments to the state's plan for aid and services to needy families with children under Part A, Title IV, Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 601 et seq.), that are necessary to maximize federal funding; and

(2) the executive commissioner shall establish by rule any reporting procedures that federal law requires as a condition of receiving federal matching funds.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 609, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 6.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.294, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.006. REPORT. (a) Not later than November 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall publish a report that summarizes reports from family violence centers under contract with the commission and that analyzes the effectiveness of the contracts authorized by this chapter. The reports must include information on the expenditure of funds authorized under this chapter, the services provided, the number of persons for whom a service was provided, and any other information relating to the provision of family violence services. Copies of the report shall be submitted to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the Legislative Budget Board, and the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives having primary jurisdiction over the commission.

(b) The report required under Subsection (a) may be published electronically on the commission's Internet website. The commission shall notify each agency entitled to receive a copy of the report that the report is available on the commission's Internet website on or before the date the report is due.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1312 (S.B. 59), Sec. 72, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.295, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.007. CONFIDENTIALITY. The commission may not disclose any information that would identify:

(1) a particular family violence center location;

(2) a board member of a family violence center or family violence special project; or

(3) a person working at or receiving services through a family violence center or family violence special project.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 636, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.296, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.008. CONSULTATIONS. In implementing this chapter, the commission shall consult with individuals and groups having knowledge of and experience in the problems of family violence.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.297, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.009. GRANTS AND FUNDS. The commission may seek other funds that may be available for the contracts authorized by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.298, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.010. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.299, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.011. FUNDING. (a) In order to finance the program created by this chapter, the commission is authorized to solicit and receive grants of money from either private or public sources, including appropriation by the legislature from the general revenue fund of the State of Texas, and in that regard it is hereby declared that the need for and importance of this program require priority and preferential consideration in appropriation.

(b) The commission may use not more than six percent of the annual legislative appropriation to the family violence program for administration of this chapter and not more than six percent annually for the contracts described in Section 51.003(c).

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3313, ch. 867, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.300, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 51.012. COORDINATION OF SERVICES. The commission and the Department of Family and Protective Services shall coordinate the provision of violence prevention services for children.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.301, eff. April 2, 2015.